Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,124.04
Risk-based corrective action; department provide briefing.

The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall provide briefing on the use by the department of risk-based corrective action. The briefing shall be directed toward comprehension and knowledge of the use by the department of risk-based corrective action, and a fee may be charged for attending the briefing which shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Cash Fund. The department may contract for providing such briefing and shall maintain and make available to the public a list of attendees.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 45;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 122;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 412.